Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB652.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 13.10. Reporting Requirements of Interactive Computer Service Providers.--(a) As soon as reasonably practicable after obtaining actual knowledge that an individual has engaged in, or plans to engage in, the unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in this Commonwealth in violation of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 section 13(a)(30), an interactive computer service provider shall report to the Pennsylvania State Police the mailing address, telephone number, facsimile number and electronic mail address of, and single point of contact for, the individual.(b) To the extent that the facts and circumstances under subsection (a) are within the custody or control of the interactive computer service provider, the report under subsection (a) shall include the following:(1) Information relating to the identity of the individual described in subsection (a), which, to the extent reasonably practicable, may include:(i) the electronic mail address, Internet Protocol address, uniform resource locator, payment information, excluding personally identifiable information, screen names or monikers for the account used or any other account associated with the individual; or(ii) any other identifying information, including self-reported identifying information.(2) Information relating to when and how a customer or subscriber of the interactive computer service provider uploaded, transmitted or received content relating to the report or when and how content relating to the report was reported to or discovered by the interactive computer service provider, including a date and time stamp and time zone.(3) Information relating to the geographic location of the individual, which may include the Internet Protocol address or verified address or, if not reasonably available, at least one form of geographic identifying information, including area code or zip code, provided by the customer or subscriber or stored or obtained by the interactive computer service provider, and any 20250HB0652PN0661 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information as to whether a virtual private network was used.(4) Data, including symbols, photos, video, icons or direct messages, relating to apparent activity involving the unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance or other content relating to the incident that is the subject of the report.(5) The electronic communications of the individual relating to the unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in this Commonwealth in violation of section 13(a)(30), including:(i) Data or information regarding the transmission of the electronic communication.(ii) Data or other digital files contained in, or attached to, the electronic communication.(c) An interactive computer service provider that knowingly and wilfully fails to make a report required by this section shall be subject to the following:(1) For a first offense, a fine not to exceed $150,000.(2) For a second or subsequent offense, a fine not to exceed $300,000.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an interactive computer service provider to:(1) monitor a user, subscriber or customer of the interactive computer service provider;(2) monitor the content of an electronic communication of a person described in paragraph (1); or(3) affirmatively search, screen or scan for individuals engaged in the unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in this Commonwealth in violation of section 13(a)(30).20250HB0652PN0661 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic." Relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities."Electronic communication." A transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, emojis or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a computer, wire, radio, mobile telephone, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photo-optical system that affects interstate or foreign commerce."Interactive computer service provider." A provider of an Internet website or digital social networking application, a primary purpose of which is facilitating social interaction with other users of the website or application and has all of the following capabilities:(1) Allows users, subscribers or customers, through the creation of Internet web pages or profiles or other similar means, to provide personal information to the public or other users of the Internet website.(2) Offers a mechanism for electronic communication among users, subscribers or customers of the Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0652PN0661 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324